Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4385.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17J of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “children under the age
of 18” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- any individual.
SECTION 2. Section 10G of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out, in line 1, the words “For children under the age of 18, the
division” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- The division.
SECTION 3. Section 47BB of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 6 to 8, inclusive, the words “a child under the age of 18
shall cover the cost of treating cleft lip and cleft palate for the child” and inserting in place
of 2

thereof the following words:- an individual shall cover the cost of treating cleft lip and cleft
palate for the individual.
SECTION 4. Section 8EE of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 7 to 9, inclusive, the words “a child under the age of 18
shall provide coverage for the cost of treating cleft lip and cleft palate for the child” and inserting
in place thereof the following words:- an individual shall provide coverage for the cost of
treating cleft lip and cleft palate for the individual.
SECTION 5. Section 4EE of chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 31 and 32, the words “a child under the age of 18 shall
provide coverage for the cost of treating cleft lip and cleft palate for the child” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- an individual shall provide coverage for the cost of treating
cleft lip and cleft palate for the individual.
SECTION 6. Section 4W of chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2 to 4, inclusive, the words “a child under the age of 18
shall provide coverage for the cost of treating cleft lip and cleft palate for the child” and inserting
in place thereof the following words:- an individual shall provide coverage for the cost of
treating cleft lip and cleft palate for the individual.
SECTION 7. Section 12 of chapter 176I of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “a child under the age of 18 shall provide
coverage for the cost of treating cleft lip and cleft palate for the child” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- an individual shall provide coverage for the cost of treating cleft
lip and cleft palate for the individual.
of 2